Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0783.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7c. (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this act, if a recipient of an economic incentive is a publicly traded entity, the recipient shall not undertake a stock buyback during the period the recipient is receiving the economic incentive or subject to a written agreement regarding the economic incentive. (2) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the Michigan strategic fund shall not enter into a written agreement for an economic incentive with a publicly traded entity unless the written agreement includes both of the following: (i) A provision that the publicly traded entity shall not undertake a stock buyback during the period the publicly traded entity is receiving the economic incentive or subject to the written agreement. (ii) A provision requiring termination of the written agreement and repayment of any economic incentives received plus a penalty equal to 10% of the amount of economic incentives received if there is a breach of the provision described in subparagraph (i). (3) As used in this section: (a) "Economic incentive" means a grant, loan, tax capture or abatement, or other economic assistance or benefit provided under a program administered by, or under which an applicant must seek certification, approval, or other action by, the Michigan strategic fund under this act or another law of this state. (b) "Michigan strategic fund" includes the fund and the authorized officers, employees, and agents of the fund, including the MEDC and its employees. (c) "Stock buyback" means the acquisition by an entity of its own issued and outstanding shares, whether by purchase, exchange, or other lawful means, that results in the shares being retired, canceled, or held as treasury shares.